District of Columbia statutes.
47-1812.01

General duties of Mayor.

The Mayor is hereby required to administer the provisions of this chapter. As soon as practicable after the return is filed, the Mayor shall examine it and shall determine the correct amount of tax.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 352, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 1
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1812.1.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586.

Prior Codifications